Rhode Island, session 2025, SB345.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Title 5 of the General Laws entitled "BUSINESSES AND PROFESSIONS"
is hereby amended by adding thereto the following chapter:
CHAPTER 64.2
DIETITIAN LICENSURE COMPACT
5-64.2-1. Short title.
This chapter shall be known and may be cited as "Dietitian Licensure Compact".
5-64.2-2. Purpose.
The purpose of this chapter is to facilitate interstate practice of dietetics with the goal of
improving public access to dietetics services. This chapter preserves the regulatory authority of the
state to protect public health and safety through the current system of state licensure, while also
providing for licensure portability through a compact privilege granted to qualifying professionals.
5-64.2-3. Definitions.
For purposes of this section, the following terms shall have the following meanings:
(1) "ACEND" means the Accreditation Council for Education in Nutrition and Dietetics or
its successor organization.
(2) "Active military member" means any individual with full-time duty status in the active
armed forces of the United States, including members of the National Guard and Reserve.
(3) "Adverse action" means any administrative, civil, equitable or criminal action permitted
by a state's laws which is imposed by a licensing authority or other authority against a licensee,

including actions against an individual's license or compact privilege such as revocation,
suspension, probation, monitoring of the licensee, limitation on the licensee's practice, or any other
encumbrance on licensure affecting a licensee's authorization to practice, including issuance of a
cease and desist action.
(4) "Alternative program" means a non-disciplinary monitoring or practice remediation
process approved by a licensing authority.
(5) "CDR" means the Commission on Dietetic Registration or its successor organization
(6) "Charter member state" means any member state which enacted the compact by law
before the effective date pursuant to § 5-64.2-13.
(7) "Compact commission" means the government agency whose membership consists of
all states that have enacted the compact, which is known as the dietitian licensure compact
commission, pursuant to § 5-64.2-9, and which shall operate as an instrumentality of the member
states.
(8) "Compact privilege" means a legal authorization, which is equivalent to a license,
permitting the practice of dietetics in a remote state.
(9) "Continuing education" means a requirement, as a condition of license renewal, to
provide evidence of participation in, and completion of, educational and professional activities
relevant to practice or area of work.
(10) "Current significant investigative information" means:
(i) Investigative information that a licensing authority, after a preliminary inquiry that
includes notification and an opportunity for the subject licensee to respond, if required by state law,
has reason to believe is not groundless and, if proved true, would indicate more than a minor
infraction; or
(ii) Investigative information that indicates that the subject licensee represents an
immediate threat to public health and safety regardless of whether the subject licensee has been
notified and had an opportunity to respond.
(11) "Data system" means a repository of information about licensees, including, but not
limited to, continuing education, examination, licensure, investigative, compact privilege and
adverse action information.
(12) "Encumbered license" means a license in which an adverse action restricts a licensee's
ability to practice dietetics.
(13) "Encumbrance" means a revocation or suspension of, or any limitation on a licensee's
full and unrestricted practice of dietetics by a licensing authority.
(14) "Executive committee" means a group of delegates elected or appointed to act on
LC000769 - Page 2 of 23

behalf of, and within the powers granted to them by, the compact, and the compact commission.
(15) "Home state" means the member state that is the licensee's primary state of residence
or that has been designated pursuant to § 5-64.2-7.
(16) "Investigative information" means information, records, and documents received or
generated by a licensing authority pursuant to an investigation.
(17) "Jurisprudence requirement" means an assessment of an individual's knowledge of the
state laws and regulations governing the practice of dietetics in such state.
(18) "License" means an authorization from a member state to either:
(i) Engage in the practice of dietetics (including medical nutrition therapy); or
(ii) Use the title "dietitian," "licensed dietitian," "licensed dietitian nutritionist," "certified
dietitian," or other title describing a substantially similar practitioner as the compact commission
may further define by rule.
(19) "Licensee" or "licensed dietitian" means an individual who currently holds a license
and who meets all of the requirements set forth in § 5-64.2-5.
(20) "Licensing authority" means the board or agency of a state, or equivalent, that is
responsible for the licensing and regulation of the practice of dietetics.
(21) "Member state" means a state that has enacted the compact.
(22) "Practice of dietetics" means the synthesis and application of dietetics, primarily for
the provision of nutrition care services, including medical nutrition therapy, in person or via
telehealth, to prevent, manage, or treat diseases or medical conditions and promote wellness.
(23) "Registered dietitian" means a person who:
(i) Has completed applicable education, experience, examination, and recertification
requirements approved by CDR;
(ii) Is credentialed by CDR as a registered dietitian or a registered dietitian nutritionist; and
(iii) Is legally authorized to use the title registered dietitian or registered dietitian
nutritionist and the corresponding abbreviations "RD" or "RDN."
(24) "Remote state" means a member state other than the home state, where a licensee is
exercising or seeking to exercise a compact privilege.
(25) "Rule" means a regulation promulgated by the compact commission that has the force
of law.
(26) "Single state license" means a license issued by a member state within the issuing state
and does not include a compact privilege in any other member state.
(27) "State" means any state, commonwealth, district, or territory of the United States of
America.
LC000769 - Page 3 of 23

(28) "Unencumbered license" means a license that authorizes a licensee to engage in the
full and unrestricted practice of dietetics.
5-64.2-4. State participation in the compact.
(a) To participate in the compact, a state must currently:
(1) License and regulate the practice of dietetics; and
(2) Have a mechanism in place for receiving and investigating complaints about licensees.
(b) A member state shall:
(1) Participate fully in the compact commission's data system, including using the unique
identifier as defined in rules;
(2) Notify the compact commission, in compliance with the terms of the compact and rules,
of any adverse action or the availability of current significant investigative information regarding
a licensee;
(3) Implement or utilize procedures for considering the criminal history record information
of applicants for an initial compact privilege. These procedures shall include the submission of
fingerprints or other biometric-based information by applicants for the purpose of obtaining an
applicant's criminal history record information from the federal bureau of investigation and the
agency responsible for retaining that state's criminal records;
(i) A member state must fully implement a criminal history record information
requirement, within a time frame established by rule, which includes receiving the results of the
federal bureau of investigation record search and shall use those results in determining compact
privilege eligibility.
(ii) Communication between a member state and the compact commission or among
member states regarding the verification of eligibility for a compact privilege shall not include any
information received from the federal bureau of investigation relating to a federal criminal history
record information check performed by a member state.
(4) Comply with and enforce the rules of the compact commission;
(5) Require an applicant for a compact privilege to obtain or retain a license in the licensee's
home state and meet the home state's qualifications for licensure or renewal of licensure, as well as
all other applicable state laws; and
(6) Recognize a compact privilege granted to a licensee who meets all of the requirements
outlined in § 5-64.2-5 in accordance with the terms of the compact and rules.
(c) Member states may set and collect a fee for granting a compact privilege.
(d) Individuals not residing in a member state shall continue to be able to apply for a
member state's single state license as provided under the laws of each member state. However, the
LC000769 - Page 4 of 23

single state license granted to these individuals shall not be recognized as granting a compact
privilege to engage in the practice of dietetics in any other member state.
(e) Nothing in this chapter shall affect the requirements established by a member state for
the issuance of a single state license.
(f) At no point shall the compact commission have the power to define the requirements
for the issuance of a single state license to practice dietetics. The member states shall retain sole
jurisdiction over the provision of these requirements.
5-64.2-5. Compact privilege.
(a) To exercise the compact privilege under the terms and provisions of this chapter, the
licensee shall:
(1) Satisfy one of the following:
(i) Hold a valid current registration that gives the applicant the right to use the term
registered dietitian; or
(ii) Complete all of the following:
(A) An education program which is either:
(I) A master's degree or doctoral degree that is programmatically accredited by ACEND or
a dietetics accrediting agency recognized by the United States Department of Education, which the
compact commission may by rule determine, and from a college or university accredited at the time
of graduation by the appropriate regional accrediting agency recognized by the council on higher
education accreditation and the United States Department of Education.
(II) An academic degree from a college or university in a foreign country equivalent to the
degree described in subsection (a) of this section, that is programmatically accredited by ACEND
or a dietetics accrediting agency recognized by the United States Department of Education, which
the compact commission may by rule determine.
(B) A planned, documented, supervised practice experience in dietetics that is
programmatically accredited by ACEND, or a dietetics accrediting agency recognized by the
United States Department of Education which the compact commission may by rule determine and
which involves at least one thousand (1,000) hours of practice experience under the supervision of
a registered dietitian or a licensed dietitian.
(C) Successful completion of either:
(I) The registration examination for dietitians administered by CDR; or
(II) A national credentialing examination for dietitians approved by the compact
commission by rule; such completion being no more than five (5) years prior to the date of the
licensee's application for initial licensure and accompanied by a period of continuous licensure
LC000769 - Page 5 of 23

thereafter, all of which may be further governed by the rules of the compact commission.
(2) Hold an unencumbered license in the home state;
(3) Notify the compact commission that the licensee is seeking a compact privilege within
a remote state(s);
(4) Pay any applicable fees, including any state fee, for the compact privilege;
(5) Meet any jurisprudence requirements established by the remote state(s) in which the
licensee is seeking a compact privilege; and
(6) Report to the compact commission any adverse action, encumbrance, or restriction on
a license taken by any non-member state within thirty (30) days from the date the action is taken.
(b) The compact privilege is valid until the expiration date of the home state license. To
maintain a compact privilege, renewal of the compact privilege shall be congruent with the renewal
of the home state license as the compact commission may define by rule. The licensee must comply
with the requirements of subsection (a) of this section to maintain the compact privilege in the
remote state(s).
(c) A licensee exercising a compact privilege shall adhere to the laws and regulations of
the remote state. Licensees shall be responsible for educating themselves on, and complying with,
any and all state laws relating to the practice of dietetics in such remote state.
(d) Notwithstanding anything to the contrary provided in this compact or state law, a
licensee exercising a compact privilege shall not be required to complete continuing education
requirements required by a remote state. A licensee exercising a compact privilege is only required
to meet any continuing education requirements as required by the home state.
5-64.2-6. Obtaining a new home state license based on a compact privilege.
(a) A licensee may hold a home state license, which allows for a compact privilege in other
member states, in only one member state at a time.
(b) If a licensee changes home state by moving between two (2) member states:
(1) The licensee shall file an application for obtaining a new home state license based on a
compact privilege, pay all applicable fees, and notify the current and new home state in accordance
with the rules of the compact commission.
(2) Upon receipt of an application for obtaining a new home state license by virtue of a
compact privilege, the new home state shall verify that the licensee meets the criteria set forth in §
5-64.2-5 via the data system, and require that the licensee complete the following:
(i) Federal bureau of investigation fingerprint based criminal history record information
check;
(ii) Any other criminal history record information required by the new home state; and
LC000769 - Page 6 of 23

(iii) Any jurisprudence requirements of the new home state.
(3) The former home state shall convert the former home state license into a compact
privilege once the new home state has activated the new home state license in accordance with
applicable rules adopted by the compact commission.
(4) Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, if the licensee cannot meet the
criteria set forth in § 5-64.2-5, the new home state may apply its requirements for issuing a new
single state license.
(5) The licensee shall pay all applicable fees to the new home state in order to be issued a
new home state license.
(c) If a licensee changes their state of residence by moving from a member state to a non-
member state, or from a non-member state to a member state, the state criteria shall apply for
issuance of a single state license in the new state.
(d) Nothing in this chapter shall interfere with a licensee's ability to hold a single state
license in multiple states; however, for the purposes of this chapter, a licensee shall have only one
home state license.
(e) Nothing in this chapter shall affect the requirements established by a member state for
the issuance of a single state license.
5-64.2-7. Active military members and spouses.
An active military member, or their spouse, shall designate a home state where the
individual has a current license in good standing. The individual may retain the home state
designation during the period the service member is on active duty.
5-64.2-8. Adverse actions.
(a) In addition to the other powers conferred by state law, a remote state shall have the
authority, in accordance with existing state due process law, to:
(1) Take adverse action against a licensee's compact privilege within that member state;
and
(2) Issue subpoenas for both hearings and investigations that require the attendance and
testimony of witnesses as well as the production of evidence. Subpoenas issued by a licensing
authority in a member state for the attendance and testimony of witnesses or the production of
evidence from another member state shall be enforced in the latter state by any court of competent
jurisdiction, according to the practice and procedure applicable to subpoenas issued in proceedings
pending before that court. The issuing authority shall pay any witness fees, travel expenses,
mileage, and other fees required by the service statutes of the state in which the witnesses or
evidence are located.
LC000769 - Page 7 of 23

(b) Only the home state shall have the power to take adverse action against a licensee's
home state license.
(c) For purposes of taking adverse action, the home state shall give the same priority and
effect to reported conduct received from a member state as it would if the conduct had occurred
within the home state. In so doing, the home state shall apply its own state laws to determine
appropriate action.
(d) The home state shall complete any pending investigations of a licensee who changes
home states during the course of the investigations. The home state shall also have authority to take
appropriate action(s) and shall promptly report the conclusions of the investigations to the
administrator of the data system. The administrator of the data system shall promptly notify the
new home state of any adverse actions.
(e) A member state, if otherwise permitted by state law, may recover from the affected
licensee the costs of investigations and dispositions of cases resulting from any adverse action taken
against that licensee.
(f) A member state may take adverse action based on the factual findings of another remote
state; provided that, the member state follows its own procedures for taking the adverse action.
(g) Joint investigations:
(1) In addition to the authority granted to a member state by its respective state law, any
member state may participate with other member states in joint investigations of licensees.
(2) Member states shall share any investigative, litigation, or compliance materials in
furtherance of any joint investigation initiated under the chapter.
(h) If adverse action is taken by the home state against a licensee's home state license
resulting in an encumbrance on the home state license, the licensee's compact privilege(s) in all
other member states shall be revoked until all encumbrances have been removed from the home
state license. All home state disciplinary orders that impose adverse action against a licensee shall
include a statement that the licensee's compact privileges are revoked in all member states during
the pendency of the order.
(i) Once an encumbered license in the home state is restored to an unencumbered license
(as certified by the home state's licensing authority), the licensee must meet the requirements of §
5-64.2-5 and follow the administrative requirements to reapply to obtain a compact privilege in any
remote state.
(j) If a member state takes adverse action, it shall promptly notify the administrator of the
data system. The administrator of the data system shall promptly notify the other member states
state of any adverse actions.
LC000769 - Page 8 of 23

(k) Nothing in this chapter shall override a member state's decision that participation in an
alternative program may be used in lieu of adverse action.
5-64.2-9. Establishment of the dietitian licensure compact commission.
(a) The compact member states hereby create and establish a joint government agency
whose membership consists of all member states that have enacted the compact known as the
dietitian licensure compact commission. The compact commission is an instrumentality of the
compact states acting jointly and not an instrumentality of any one state. The compact commission
shall come into existence on or after the effective date of the compact as set forth in § 5-64.2-13.
(b) Membership, voting, and meetings
(1) Each member state shall have and be limited to one delegate selected by that member
state's licensing authority.
(2) The delegate shall be the primary administrator of the licensing authority or their
designee.
(3) The compact commission shall by rule or bylaw establish a term of office for delegates
and may by rule or bylaw establish term limits.
(4) The compact commission may recommend removal or suspension of any delegate from
office.
(5) A member state's licensing authority shall fill any vacancy of its delegate occurring on
the compact commission within sixty (60) days of the vacancy.
(6) Each delegate shall be entitled to one vote on all matters before the compact
commission requiring a vote by the delegates.
(7) Delegates shall meet and vote by such means as set forth in the bylaws. The bylaws
may provide for delegates to meet and vote in-person or by telecommunication, video conference,
or other means of communication.
(8) The compact commission shall meet at least once during each calendar year. Additional
meetings may be held as set forth in the bylaws. The compact commission may meet in person or
by telecommunication, video conference, or other means of communication.
(c) The compact commission shall have the following powers:
(1) Establish the fiscal year of the compact commission;
(2) Establish code of conduct and conflict of interest policies;
(3) Establish and amend rules and bylaws;
(4) Maintain its financial records in accordance with the bylaws;
(5) Meet and take such actions as are consistent with the provisions of this compact, the
compact commission's rules, and the bylaws;
LC000769 - Page 9 of 23

(6) Initiate and conclude legal proceedings or actions in the name of the compact
commission; provided that, the standing of any licensing authority to sue or be sued under
applicable law shall not be affected;
(7) Maintain and certify records and information provided to a member state as the
authenticated business records of the compact commission, and designate an agent to do so on the
compact commission's behalf;
(8) Purchase and maintain insurance and bonds;
(9) Borrow, accept, or contract for services of personnel, including, but not limited to,
employees of a member state;
(10) Conduct an annual financial review;
(11) Hire employees, elect or appoint officers, fix compensation, define duties, grant such
individuals appropriate authority to carry out the purposes of the compact, and establish the
compact commission's personnel policies and programs relating to conflicts of interest,
qualifications of personnel, and other related personnel matters;
(12) Assess and collect fees;
(13) Accept any and all appropriate donations, grants of money, other sources of revenue,
equipment, supplies, materials, services, and gifts, and receive, utilize, and dispose of the same;
provided that, at all times the compact commission shall avoid any actual or appearance of
impropriety or conflict of interest;
(14) Lease, purchase, retain, own, hold, improve, or use any property, real, personal, or
mixed, or any undivided interest therein;
(15) Sell, convey, mortgage, pledge, lease, exchange, abandon, or otherwise dispose of any
property real, personal, or mixed;
(16) Establish a budget and make expenditures;
(17) Borrow money;
(18) Appoint committees, including standing committees, composed of members, state
regulators, state legislators or their representatives, and consumer representatives, and such other
interested persons as may be designated in this compact or the bylaws;
(19) Provide and receive information from, and cooperate with, law enforcement agencies;
(20) Establish and elect an executive committee, including a chair and a vice chair;
(21) Determine whether a state's adopted language is materially different from the model
compact language such that the state would not qualify for participation in the compact; and
(22) Perform such other functions as may be necessary or appropriate to achieve the
purposes of this compact.
LC000769 - Page 10 of 23

(d) Executive committee.
(1) The executive committee shall have the power to act on behalf of the compact
commission according to the terms of the compact. The powers, duties, and responsibilities of the
executive committee shall include:
(i) Oversee the day-to-day activities of the administration of the compact including
enforcement and compliance with the provisions of the compact, its rules and bylaws, and other
such duties as deemed necessary;
(ii) Recommend to the compact commission changes to the rules or bylaws, changes to this
compact legislation, fees charged to compact member states, fees charged to licensees, and other
fees;
(iii) Ensure compact administration services are appropriately provided, including by
contract;
(iv) Prepare and recommend the budget;
(v) Maintain financial records on behalf of the compact commission;
(vi) Monitor compact compliance of member states and provide compliance reports to the
compact commission;
(vii) Establish additional committees as necessary;
(viii) Exercise the powers and duties of the compact commission during the interim
between compact commission meetings, except for adopting or amending rules, adopting or
amending bylaws, and exercising any other powers and duties expressly reserved to the compact
commission by rule or bylaw; and
(vix) Other duties as provided in the rules or bylaws of the compact commission.
(2) The executive committee shall be composed of nine (9) members:
(i) The chair and vice chair of the compact commission shall be voting members of the
executive committee;
(ii) Five (5) voting members from the current membership of the compact commission,
elected by the compact commission;
(iii) One exofficio, nonvoting member from a recognized professional association
representing dietitians; and
(iv) One exofficio, nonvoting member from a recognized national credentialing
organization for dietitians.
(3) The compact commission may remove any member of the executive committee as
provided in the compact commission's bylaws.
(4) The executive committee shall meet at least annually.
LC000769 - Page 11 of 23

(i) Executive committee meetings shall be open to the public, except that the executive
committee may meet in a closed, non-public meeting as provided in subsection (f) of this section.
(ii) The executive committee shall give thirty (30) days notice of its meetings, posted on
the website of the compact commission and as determined to provide notice to persons with an
interest in the business of the compact commission.
(iii) The executive committee may hold a special meeting in accordance with subsection
(f) of this section.
(e) The compact commission shall adopt and provide to the member states an annual report.
(f) Meetings of the compact commission
(1) All meetings shall be open to the public, except that the compact commission may meet
in a closed, non-public meeting as provided in subsection (f)(2) of this section.
(i) Public notice for all meetings of the full compact commission shall be given in the same
manner as required under the rulemaking provisions in § 5-64.2-11, except that the compact
commission may hold a special meeting as provided in subsection (f)(1)(ii) of this section.
(ii) The compact commission may hold a special meeting when it must meet to conduct
emergency business by giving twenty-four (24) hours notice to all member states, on the compact
commission's website, and other means as provided in the compact commission's rules. The
compact commission's legal counsel shall certify that the compact commission's need to meet
qualifies as an emergency.
(2) The compact commission or the executive committee or other committees of the
compact commission may convene in a closed, non-public meeting for the compact commission or
executive committee or other committees of the compact commission to receive legal advice or to
discuss:
(i) Non-compliance of a member state with its obligations under the compact;
(ii) The employment, compensation, discipline, or other matters, practices, or procedures
related to specific employees;
(iii) Current or threatened discipline of a licensee by the compact commission or by a
member state's licensing authority;
(iv) Current, threatened, or reasonably anticipated litigation;
(v) Negotiation of contracts for the purchase, lease, or sale of goods, services, or real estate;
(vi) Accusing any person of a crime or formally censuring any person;
(vii) Trade secrets or commercial or financial information that is privileged or confidential;
(viii) Information of a personal nature where disclosure would constitute a clearly
unwarranted invasion of personal privacy;
LC000769 - Page 12 of 23

(vix) Investigative records compiled for law enforcement purposes;
(x) Information related to any investigative reports prepared by or on behalf of or for use
of the compact commission or other committee charged with responsibility of investigation or
determination of compliance issues pursuant to this chapter;
(xi) Matters specifically exempted from disclosure by federal or member state law; or
(xii) Other matters as specified in the rules of the compact commission.
(3) If a meeting, or portion of a meeting, is closed, the presiding officer shall state that the
meeting will be closed and reference each relevant exempting provision, and such reference shall
be recorded in the minutes.
(4) The compact commission shall keep minutes that fully and clearly describe all matters
discussed in a meeting and shall provide a full and accurate summary of actions taken, and the
reasons therefore, including a description of the views expressed. All documents considered in
connection with an action shall be identified in such minutes. All minutes and documents of a
closed meeting shall remain under seal, subject to release only by a majority vote of the compact
commission or order of a court of competent jurisdiction.
(g) Financing of the compact commission.
(1) The compact commission shall pay, or provide for the payment of, the reasonable
expenses of its establishment, organization, and ongoing activities.
(2) The compact commission may accept any and all appropriate revenue sources as
provided in subsection (c) of this section.
(3) The compact commission may levy on and collect an annual assessment from each
member state and impose fees on licensees of member states to whom it grants a compact privilege
to cover the cost of the operations and activities of the compact commission and its staff, which
must, in a total amount, be sufficient to cover its annual budget as approved each year for which
revenue is not provided by other sources. The aggregate annual assessment amount for member
states shall be allocated based upon a formula that the compact commission shall promulgate by
rule.
(4) The compact commission shall not incur obligations of any kind prior to securing the
funds adequate to meet the same; nor shall the compact commission pledge the credit of any of the
member states, except by and with the authority of the member state.
(5) The compact commission shall keep accurate accounts of all receipts and
disbursements. The receipts and disbursements of the compact commission shall be subject to the
financial review and accounting procedures established under its bylaws. However, all receipts and
disbursements of funds handled by the compact commission shall be subject to an annual financial
LC000769 - Page 13 of 23

review by a certified or licensed public accountant, and the report of the financial review shall be
included in and become part of the annual report of the compact commission.
(h) Qualified immunity, defense, and indemnification.
(1) The members, officers, executive director, employees and representatives of the
compact commission shall be immune from suit and liability, both personally and in their official
capacity, for any claim for damage to or loss of property or personal injury or other civil liability
caused by or arising out of any actual or alleged act, error, or omission that occurred, or that the
person against whom the claim is made had a reasonable basis for believing occurred within the
scope of compact commission employment, duties, or responsibilities; provided that, nothing in
this section shall be construed to protect any such person from suit or liability for any damage, loss,
injury, or liability caused by the intentional or willful or wanton misconduct of that person. The
procurement of insurance of any type by the compact commission shall not in any way compromise
or limit the immunity granted hereunder.
(2) The compact commission shall defend any member, officer, executive director,
employee, and representative of the compact commission in any civil action seeking to impose
liability arising out of any actual or alleged act, error, or omission that occurred within the scope
of compact commission employment, duties, or responsibilities, or as determined by the compact
commission that the person against whom the claim is made had a reasonable basis for believing
occurred within the scope of compact commission employment, duties, or responsibilities;
provided that, nothing herein shall be construed to prohibit that person from retaining their own
counsel at their own expense; and provided, further, that the actual or alleged act, error, or omission
did not result from that person's intentional or willful or wanton misconduct.
(3) The compact commission shall indemnify and hold harmless any member, officer,
executive director, employee, and representative of the compact commission for the amount of any
settlement or judgment obtained against that person arising out of any actual or alleged act, error,
or omission that occurred within the scope of compact commission employment, duties, or
responsibilities, or that such person had a reasonable basis for believing occurred within the scope
of compact commission employment, duties, or responsibilities; provided that, the actual or alleged
act, error, or omission did not result from the intentional or willful or wanton misconduct of that
person.
(4) Nothing herein shall be construed as a limitation on the liability of any licensee for
professional malpractice or misconduct, which shall be governed solely by any other applicable
state laws.
(5) Nothing in this chapter shall be interpreted to waive or otherwise abrogate a member
LC000769 - Page 14 of 23

state's state action immunity or state action affirmative defense with respect to antitrust claims
under the Sherman Act, Clayton Act, or any other state or federal antitrust or anticompetitive law
or regulation.
(6) Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to be a waiver of sovereign immunity by the
member states or by the compact commission.
5-64.2-10. Data system.
(a) The compact commission shall provide for the development, maintenance, operation,
and utilization of a coordinated data system.
(b) The compact commission shall assign each applicant for a compact privilege a unique
identifier, as determined by the rules.
(c) Notwithstanding any other provision of state law to the contrary, a member state shall
submit a uniform data set to the data system on all individuals to whom this compact is applicable
as required by the rules of the compact commission, including:
(1) Identifying information;
(2) Licensure data;
(3) Adverse actions against a license or compact privilege and information related thereto;
(4) Non-confidential information related to alternative program participation, the
beginning and ending dates of such participation, and other information related to such participation
not made confidential under member state law;
(5) Any denial of application for licensure, and the reason(s) for such denial;
(6) The presence of current significant investigative information; and
(7) Other information that may facilitate the administration of this chapter or the protection
of the public, as determined by the rules of the compact commission.
(d) The records and information provided to a member state pursuant to this chapter or
through the data system, when certified by the compact commission or an agent thereof, shall
constitute the authenticated business records of the compact commission, and shall be entitled to
any associated hearsay exception in any relevant judicial, quasi-judicial, or administrative
proceedings in a member state.
(e) Current significant investigative information pertaining to a licensee in any member
state will only be available to other member states.
(f) It is the responsibility of the member states to report any adverse action against a
licensee and to monitor the data system to determine whether any adverse action has been taken
against a licensee. Adverse action information pertaining to a licensee in any member state will be
available to any other member state.
LC000769 - Page 15 of 23

(g) Member states contributing information to the data system may designate information
that may not be shared with the public without the express permission of the contributing state.
(h) Any information submitted to the data system that is subsequently expunged pursuant
to federal law or the laws of the member state contributing the information shall be removed from
the data system.
5-64.2-11. Rulemaking.
(a) The compact commission shall promulgate reasonable rules in order to effectively and
efficiently implement and administer the purposes and provisions of the chapter. A rule shall be
invalid and have no force or effect only if a court of competent jurisdiction holds that the rule is
invalid because the compact commission exercised its rulemaking authority in a manner that is
beyond the scope and purposes of the compact, or the powers granted hereunder, or based upon
another applicable standard of review.
(b) The rules of the compact commission shall have the force of law in each member state;
provided, however that, where the rules conflict with the laws or regulations of a member state that
relate to the procedures, actions, and processes a licensed dietitian is permitted to undertake in that
state and the circumstances under which they may do so, as held by a court of competent
jurisdiction, the rules of the compact commission shall be ineffective in that state to the extent of
the conflict.
(c) The compact commission shall exercise its rulemaking powers pursuant to the criteria
set forth in this section and the rules adopted thereunder. Rules shall become binding on the day
following adoption or as of the date specified in the rule or amendment, whichever is later.
(d) If a majority of the legislatures of the member states rejects a rule or portion of a rule,
by enactment of a statute or resolution in the same manner used to adopt the compact within four
(4) years of the date of adoption of the rule, then such rule shall have no further force and effect in
any member state.
(e) Rules shall be adopted at a regular or special meeting of the compact commission.
(f) Prior to adoption of a proposed rule, the compact commission shall hold a public hearing
and allow persons to provide oral and written comments, data, facts, opinions, and arguments.
(g) Prior to adoption of a proposed rule by the compact commission, and at least thirty (30)
days in advance of the meeting at which the compact commission will hold a public hearing on the
proposed rule, the compact commission shall provide a notice of proposed rulemaking:
(1) On the website of the compact commission or other publicly accessible platform;
(2) To persons who have requested notice of the compact commission's notices of proposed
rulemaking; and
LC000769 - Page 16 of 23

(3) In such other way(s) as the compact commission may by rule specify.
(h) The notice of proposed rulemaking shall include:
(1) The time, date, and location of the public hearing at which the compact commission
will hear public comments on the proposed rule and, if different, the time, date, and location of the
meeting where the compact commission will consider and vote on the proposed rule;
(2) If the hearing is held via telecommunication, video conference, or other means of
communication, the compact commission shall include the mechanism for access to the hearing in
the notice of proposed rulemaking;
(3) The text of the proposed rule and the reason therefore;
(4) A request for comments on the proposed rule from any interested person; and
(5) The manner in which interested persons may submit written comments.
(i) All hearings will be recorded. A copy of the recording and all written comments and
documents received by the compact commission in response to the proposed rule shall be available
to the public.
(j) Nothing in this section shall be construed as requiring a separate hearing on each rule.
Rules may be grouped for the convenience of the compact commission at hearings required by this
section.
(k) The compact commission shall, by majority vote of all members, take final action on
the proposed rule based on the rulemaking record and the full text of the rule.
(1) The compact commission may adopt changes to the proposed rule provided the changes
do not enlarge the original purpose of the proposed rule.
(2) The compact commission shall provide an explanation of the reasons for substantive
changes made to the proposed rule as well as reasons for substantive changes not made that were
recommended by commenters.
(3) The compact commission shall determine a reasonable effective date for the rule.
Except for an emergency as provided in subsection (l) of this section, the effective date of the rule
shall be no sooner than thirty (30) days after issuing the notice that it adopted or amended the rule.
(l) Upon determination that an emergency exists, the compact commission may consider
and adopt an emergency rule with twenty-four (24) hours notice, with opportunity to comment;
provided that, the usual rulemaking procedures provided in the compact and in this section shall be
retroactively applied to the rule as soon as reasonably possible, in no event later than ninety (90)
days after the effective date of the rule. For the purposes of this provision, an emergency rule is
one that must be adopted immediately in order to:
(1) Meet an imminent threat to public health, safety, or welfare;
LC000769 - Page 17 of 23

(2) Prevent a loss of compact commission or member state funds;
(3) Meet a deadline for the promulgation of a rule that is established by federal law or rule;
or
(4) Protect public health and safety.
(m) The compact commission or an authorized committee of the compact commission may
direct revision to a previously adopted rule for purposes of correcting typographical errors, errors
in format, errors in consistency, or grammatical errors. Public notice of any revision shall be posted
on the website of the compact commission. The revision shall be subject to challenge by any person
for a period of thirty (30) days after posting. The revision may be challenged only on grounds that
the revision results in a material change to a rule. A challenge shall be made in writing and delivered
to the compact commission prior to the end of the notice period. If no challenge is made, the
revision will take effect without further action. If the revision is challenged, the revision may not
take effect without the approval of the compact commission.
(n) No member state's rulemaking requirements shall apply under this chapter.
5-64.2-12. Oversight, dispute resolution and enforcement.
(a) Oversight.
(1) The executive and judicial branches of state government in each member state shall
enforce this compact and take all actions necessary and appropriate to implement this compact.
(2) Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, venue is proper and judicial proceedings
by or against the compact commission shall be brought solely and exclusively in a court of
competent jurisdiction where the principal office of the compact commission is located. The
compact commission may waive venue and jurisdictional defenses to the extent it adopts or
consents to participate in alternative dispute resolution proceedings. Nothing herein shall affect or
limit the selection or propriety of venue in any action against a licensee for professional
malpractice, misconduct, or any such similar matter.
(3) The compact commission shall be entitled to receive service of process in any
proceeding regarding the enforcement or interpretation of the compact and shall have standing to
intervene in such a proceeding for all purposes. Failure to provide the compact commission service
of process shall render a judgment or order void as to the compact commission, this compact, or
promulgated rules.
(b) Default, technical assistance and termination.
(1) If the compact commission determines that a member state has defaulted in the
performance of its obligations or responsibilities under this chapter or the promulgated rules, the
compact commission shall provide written notice to the defaulting state. The notice of default shall
LC000769 - Page 18 of 23

describe the default, the proposed means of curing the default, and any other action that the compact
commission may take and shall offer training and specific technical assistance regarding the
default.
(2) The compact commission shall provide a copy of the notice of default to the other
member states.
(c) If a state in default fails to cure the default, the defaulting state may be terminated from
the compact upon an affirmative vote of a majority of the delegates of the member states, and all
rights, privileges, and benefits conferred on that state by this compact may be terminated on the
effective date of termination. A cure of the default does not relieve the offending state of obligations
or liabilities incurred during the period of default.
(d) Termination of membership in the compact shall be imposed only after all other means
of securing compliance have been exhausted. Notice of intent to suspend or terminate shall be given
by the compact commission to the governor, the majority and minority leaders of the defaulting
state's legislature, the defaulting state's licensing authority, and each of the member states' licensing
authority.
(e) A state that has been terminated is responsible for all assessments, obligations, and
liabilities incurred through the effective date of termination, including obligations that extend
beyond the effective date of termination.
(f) Upon the termination of a state's membership from this compact, that state shall
immediately provide notice to all licensees within that state of such termination. The terminated
state shall continue to recognize all compact privileges granted pursuant to this compact for a
minimum of six (6) months after the date of said notice of termination.
(g) The compact commission shall not bear any costs related to a state that is found to be
in default or that has been terminated from the compact, unless agreed upon in writing between the
compact commission and the defaulting state.
(h) The defaulting state may appeal the action of the compact commission by petitioning
the U.S. District Court for the District of Columbia or the federal district where the compact
commission has its principal offices. The prevailing party shall be awarded all costs of such
litigation, including reasonable attorneys' fees.
(i) Dispute resolution.
(1) Upon request by a member state, the compact commission shall attempt to resolve
disputes related to the compact that arise among member states and between member and non-
member states.
(2) The compact commission shall promulgate a rule providing for both mediation and
LC000769 - Page 19 of 23

binding dispute resolution for disputes as appropriate.
(j) Enforcement.
(1) By supermajority vote, the compact commission may initiate legal action against a
member state in default in the United States District Court for the District of Columbia or the federal
district where the compact commission has its principal offices to enforce compliance with the
provisions of the compact and its promulgated rules. The relief sought may include both injunctive
relief and damages. In the event judicial enforcement is necessary, the prevailing party shall be
awarded all costs of such litigation, including reasonable attorneys' fees. The remedies herein shall
not be the exclusive remedies of the compact commission. The compact commission may pursue
any other remedies available under federal or the defaulting member state's law.
(1) A member state may initiate legal action against the compact commission in the U.S.
District Court for the District of Columbia or the federal district where the compact commission
has its principal offices to enforce compliance with the provisions of the compact and its
promulgated rules. The relief sought may include both injunctive relief and damages. In the event
judicial enforcement is necessary, the prevailing party shall be awarded all costs of such litigation,
including reasonable attorneys' fees.
(3) No party other than a member state shall enforce this compact against the compact
commission.
5-64.2-13. Effective date, withdrawal and amendment.
(a) The compact shall come into effect on the date on which the compact is enacted into
law in the seventh member state.
(1) On or after the effective date of the compact, the compact commission shall convene
and review the enactment of each of the first seven (7) member states ("charter member states") to
determine if the statute enacted by each such charter member state is materially different than the
model compact statute.
(i) A charter member state whose enactment is found to be materially different from the
model compact statute shall be entitled to the default process set forth in § 5-64.2-12.
(ii) If any member state is later found to be in default, or is terminated, or withdraws from
the compact, the compact commission shall remain in existence and the compact shall remain in
effect even if the number of member states should be less than seven (7).
(2) Member states enacting the compact subsequent to the seven (7) initial charter member
states shall be subject to the process set forth in § 5-64.2-9 to determine if their enactments are
materially different from the model compact statute and whether they qualify for participation in
the compact.
LC000769 - Page 20 of 23

(3) All actions taken for the benefit of the compact commission or in furtherance of the
purposes of the administration of the compact prior to the effective date of the compact or the
compact commission coming into existence shall be considered to be actions of the compact
commission unless specifically repudiated by the compact commission.
(4) Any state that joins the compact subsequent to the compact commission's initial
adoption of the rules and bylaws shall be subject to the rules and bylaws as they exist on the date
on which the compact becomes law in that state. Any rule that has been previously adopted by the
compact commission shall have the full force and effect of law on the day the compact becomes
law in that state.
(b) Any member state may withdraw from this compact by enacting a statute repealing the
same.
(1) A member state's withdrawal shall not take effect until one hundred eighty (180) days
after enactment of the repealing statute.
(2) Withdrawal shall not affect the continuing requirement of the withdrawing state's
licensing authority to comply with the investigative and adverse action reporting requirements of
this compact prior to the effective date of withdrawal.
(3) Upon the enactment of a statute withdrawing from this compact, a state shall
immediately provide notice of such withdrawal to all licensees within that state. Notwithstanding
any subsequent statutory enactment to the contrary, such withdrawing state shall continue to
recognize all compact privileges granted pursuant to this compact for a minimum of one hundred
eight (180) days after the date of such notice of withdrawal.
(c) Nothing contained in this chapter shall be construed to invalidate or prevent any
licensure agreement or other cooperative arrangement between a member state and a non-member
state that does not conflict with the provisions of this chapter.
(d) The compact may be amended by the member states. No amendment to the compact
shall become effective and binding upon any member state until it is enacted into the laws of all
member states.
5-64.2-14. Construction and severability.
(a) This compact and the compact commission's rulemaking authority shall be liberally
construed so as to effectuate the purposes and the implementation and administration of the
compact. Provisions of the compact expressly authorizing or requiring the promulgation of rules
shall not be construed to limit the compact commission's rulemaking authority solely for those
purposes.
(b) The provisions of this chapter shall be severable and if any phrase, clause, sentence, or
LC000769 - Page 21 of 23

provision of this chapter is held by a court of competent jurisdiction to be contrary to the
constitution of any member state, a state seeking participation in the compact, or of the United
States, or the applicability thereof to any government, agency, person, or circumstance is held to
be unconstitutional by a court of competent jurisdiction, the validity of the remainder of this chapter
and the applicability thereof to any other government, agency, person, or circumstance shall not be
affected thereby.
(c) Notwithstanding subsection (b) of this section, the compact commission may deny a
state's participation in the compact or, in accordance with the requirements of § 5-64.2-12,
terminate a member state's participation in the compact, if it determines that a constitutional
requirement of a member state is a material departure from the compact. Otherwise, if this compact
shall be held to be contrary to the constitution of any member state, the compact shall remain in
full force and effect as to the remaining member states and in full force and effect as to the member
state affected as to all severable matters.
5-64.2-15. Consistent effect and conflict with other state laws.
(a) Nothing herein shall prevent or inhibit the enforcement of any other law of a member
state that is not inconsistent with the compact.
(b) Any laws, statutes, regulations, or other legal requirements in a member state in conflict
with the compact are superseded to the extent of the conflict.
(c) All permissible agreements between the compact commission and the member states
are binding in accordance with their terms.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC000769
========
LC000769 - Page 22 of 23